Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF710.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 13.32, subdivision 5, is amended to read: Subd. 5. Directory information. (a) Educational data designated as directory information is public data on individuals to the extent required under federal law. Directory information must be designated pursuant to the provisions of: (1) this subdivision; and (2) United States Code, title 20, section 1232g, and Code of Federal Regulations, title 34, section 99.37, which were in effect on January 3, 2012. (b) When conducting the directory information designation and notice process required by federal law, an educational agency or institution shall give parents and students notice of the right to refuse to let the agency or institution designate specified data about the student as directory information. This notice may be given by any means reasonably likely to inform the parents and students of the right. (c) An educational agency or institution may not designate a student's home address, telephone number, email address, or other personal contact information as directory information under this subdivision. This paragraph does not apply to a postsecondary institution. (d) When requested, educational agencies or institutions must share personal student contact information and directory information, whether public or private, with the Minnesota Department of Education, as required for federal reporting purposes. (e) When requested, educational agencies or institutions may share personal student contact information and directory information for students served in special education with postsecondary transition planning and services under section 125A.08, paragraph (b), clause (1), whether public or private, with the Department of Employment and Economic Development, as required for coordination of services to students with disabilities under sections 125A.08, paragraph (b), clause (1); 125A.023; and 125A.027. new text begin (f) A public postsecondary institution must maintain documentation of a request for directory information on 100 students or more for four years from the date of the request. A public postsecondary institution's directory information policy must not permit an individual's email address, physical address, telephone number, or identification card photograph to be publicly disclosed. A student whose directory information has been requested must be allowed to review the documentation maintained by the institution regarding that request. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin [135A.146] STUDENT LOCATION DATA. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definition. new text end new text begin "Technology provider" means a person who: new text end new text begin (1) contracts with a public or private postsecondary educational institution to provide technological devices for student use or to provide access to a software or online application; and new text end new text begin (2) creates, receives, or maintains location data pursuant or incidental to a contract with a public or private postsecondary educational institution. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Consent. new text end new text begin (a) A public or private postsecondary educational institution must not collect data on a student's location without the student consenting to having location data collected. A public or private postsecondary educational institution must not require a student's consent to location data collection as a condition of: new text end new text begin (1) enrolling in the institution or any program or class; new text end new text begin (2) receiving a scholarship or other financial aid award; or new text end new text begin (3) entering into a dining contract, housing contract, or any other agreement for the provision of a basic university service, including connecting to campus Wi-Fi. new text end new text begin (b) A student who gives consent to having location data collected may revoke that consent at any time. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Notice. new text end new text begin (a) Within 30 days of the start of each school year, a public or private postsecondary educational institution must give students notice, by United States mail, email, or other direct form of communication, of any technology provider contract gathering a student's location data. The notice must: new text end new text begin (1) be written in plain language; new text end new text begin (2) identify each technology provider collecting location data; new text end new text begin (3) identify the location data gathered by the technology provider contract; new text end new text begin (4) include information about the consent required in subdivision 2, including the right to revoke consent; and new text end new text begin (5) include information about how to access a copy of the contract in accordance with paragraph (b). new text end new text begin (b) A public or private postsecondary educational institution must publish a complete copy of any contract with a technology provider on the institution's website for the duration of the contract. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Location data. new text end new text begin (a) A technology provider contracting with a public postsecondary institution is subject to the provisions of section 13.05, subdivision 11. An assignee or delegate that creates, receives, or maintains location data is subject to the same restrictions and obligations under this section as the technology provider. new text end new text begin (b) Location data created, received, or maintained by a technology provider pursuant or incidental to a contract with a public or private postsecondary educational institution are not the technology provider's property. new text end new text begin (c) If location data maintained by the technology provider are subject to a breach of the security of the data, as defined in section 13.055, the technology provider must, following discovery of the breach, disclose to the public postsecondary educational institution all information necessary to fulfill the requirements of section 13.055. new text end new text begin (d) Within 30 days of the expiration of the contract, unless renewal of the contract is reasonably anticipated, a technology provider must destroy or return to the appropriate public or private postsecondary educational institution all location data created, received, or maintained pursuant or incidental to the contract. new text end new text begin (e) A technology provider must not: new text end new text begin (1) sell, share, or disseminate location data, except as provided by this section or as part of a valid delegation or assignment of its contract with a public or private postsecondary educational institution; or new text end new text begin (2) use location data for any commercial purpose, including but not limited to marketing or advertising to a student or parent. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Procedures. new text end new text begin (a) A technology provider must establish written procedures to ensure appropriate security safeguards are in place for location data. A technology provider's written procedures must require that: new text end new text begin (1) only authorized employees or contractors can access the location data; new text end new text begin (2) a person is authorized to access location data only if access is necessary to fulfill official duties; and new text end new text begin (3) all actions in which location data are entered, updated, accessed, shared, or disseminated are recorded in a log of use that includes the identity of the person interacting with the data and what action was performed. Information recorded in the log of use must be retained for at least one year. new text end new text begin (b) A technology provider's written procedures establishing security safeguards for location data are public data, unless classified as not public under any other applicable law. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2025. new text end